California statutes. Civil Code
(5) Engaging in zero-rating in exchange for consideration, monetary or otherwise, from a third party.

(6) Zero-rating some Internet content, applications, services, or devices in a category of Internet content, applications, services, or devices, but not the entire category.

(7) (A) Unreasonably interfering with, or unreasonably disadvantaging, either an end user’s ability to select, access, and use broadband Internet access service or the lawful Internet content, applications, services, or devices of the end user’s choice, or an edge provider’s ability to make lawful content, applications, services, or devices available to end users. Reasonable network management shall not be a violation of this paragraph.

(B) Zero-rating Internet traffic in application-agnostic ways shall not be a violation of subparagraph (A) provided that no consideration, monetary or otherwise, is provided by any third party in exchange for the Internet service provider’s decision whether to zero-rate traffic.

(8) Failing to publicly disclose accurate information regarding the network management practices, performance, and commercial terms of its broadband Internet access services sufficient for consumers to make informed choices regarding use of those services and for content, application, service, and device providers to develop, market, and maintain Internet offerings.

(9) Engaging in practices, including, but not limited to, agreements, with respect to, related to, or in connection with, ISP traffic exchange that have the purpose or effect of evading the prohibitions contained in this section
 and Section 3102. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to prohibit Internet service providers from entering into ISP traffic exchange agreements that do not evade the prohibitions contained in this section and Section 3102.

(b) It shall be unlawful for a mobile Internet service provider, insofar as the provider is engaged in providing mobile broadband Internet access service, to engage in any of the activities described in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), and (9) of subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 976, Sec. 2.   (SB 822)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3102.

(a) It shall be unlawful for a fixed Internet service provider to offer or provide services other than broadband Internet access service that are delivered over the same last-mile connection as the broadband Internet access service, if those services satisfy either of the following conditions: 

(1) They have the purpose or effect of evading the prohibitions in Section 3101.

(2) They negatively affect the performance of broadband Internet access service.

(b) It shall be unlawful for a mobile Internet service provider to offer or provide services other than broadband Internet access service that are delivered over the same last-mile connection as the broadband Internet access service, if those services satisfy either of the conditions specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a).

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a fixed or mobile Internet service provider from offering or providing services other than broadband Internet access service that are delivered over the same last-mile connection as the broadband Internet access service and do not violate this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 976, Sec. 2.   (SB 822)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3103.

(a) Nothing in this title supersedes any obligation or authorization a fixed or mobile Internet service provider may have to address the needs of emergency communications or law enforcement, public safety, or national security authorities, consistent with or as permitted by applicable law, or limits the provider’s ability to do so.

(b) Nothing in this title prohibits reasonable efforts by a fixed or mobile Internet
 service provider to address copyright infringement or other unlawful activity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 976, Sec. 2.   (SB 822)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3104.

Notwithstanding Section 3268 or any other law, any waiver of the provisions of this title is contrary to public policy and shall be unenforceable and void.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 976, Sec. 2.   (SB 822)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 15.2. Artificial Intelligence Training Data Transparency [3110. - 3111.]

3110.

For purposes of this title, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Artificial intelligence” means an engineered or machine-based system that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments.

(b) “Developer” means a person, partnership, state or local government agency, or corporation that designs, codes,
 produces, or substantially modifies an artificial intelligence system or service for use by members of the public. For purposes of this subdivision, “members of the public” does not include an affiliate as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 1799.1a, or a hospital’s medical staff member.

(c) “Generative
 artificial intelligence” means artificial intelligence that can generate derived synthetic content, such as text, images, video, and audio, that emulates the structure and characteristics of the artificial intelligence’s training data.

(d) “Substantially modifies” or “substantial modification” means a new version, new release, or other update to a generative artificial intelligence system or service that materially changes its functionality or performance, including the results of retraining or fine tuning.

(e) “Synthetic data generation” means a process in which seed data are used to create
 artificial data that have some of the statistical characteristics of the seed data.

(f) “Train
 a generative artificial intelligence system or service” includes testing, validating, or fine tuning by the developer of the artificial intelligence system or service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 817, Sec. 1.   (AB 2013)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3111.

On or before January 1, 2026, and before each time thereafter that a generative artificial intelligence system or service, or a substantial modification to a generative artificial intelligence system or service, released on or after January 1, 2022, is made publicly available to Californians for use, regardless of whether the terms of that use include compensation, the developer of the system or service shall post on the developer’s internet website documentation regarding the data used by the developer to train the generative artificial intelligence system or service, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) A high-level summary of the datasets used in the development of the generative artificial intelligence system or service, including, but not limited to:

(1) The sources or owners of the datasets.

(2) A description of how the datasets further the intended purpose of the artificial intelligence system or service.

(3) The number of data points included in the datasets, which may be in general ranges, and with estimated figures for dynamic datasets.

(4) A description of the types of data points within the datasets. For purposes of this paragraph, the following definitions apply:

(A) As applied to datasets that include labels, “types of data points” means the types of labels used.

(B) As applied to datasets without labeling, “types of data points” refers to the general
 characteristics.

(5) Whether the datasets include any data protected by copyright, trademark, or patent, or whether the datasets are entirely in the public domain.

(6) Whether the datasets were purchased or licensed by the developer.

(7) Whether the datasets include personal information, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 1798.140.

(8) Whether the datasets include aggregate consumer information, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1798.140.

(9) Whether there was any cleaning, processing, or other modification to the datasets by the developer, including the intended purpose of those efforts in relation to the artificial intelligence system or service.

(10) The time period during which the data in the datasets were collected, including a notice if the data collection is ongoing.

(11) The dates the datasets were first used during the development of the artificial intelligence system or service.

(12) Whether the generative artificial intelligence system or service used or continuously uses synthetic data generation in its development. A developer may include a description of the functional need or desired purpose of the synthetic data in relation to the intended purpose of the system or service.

(b) A developer shall not be required to post documentation regarding the data used to train a generative artificial intelligence system or service for any of the following:

(1) A generative artificial intelligence system or service whose sole purpose is to help ensure security and integrity. For purposes of this paragraph, “security and integrity” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (ac) of Section 1798.140, except as applied to any developer or user and not limited to businesses, as defined in subdivision (d) of that section.

(2) A generative artificial intelligence system or service whose sole purpose is the operation of aircraft in the national airspace.

(3) A generative artificial intelligence system or service developed for national security, military, or defense purposes that is made available only to a federal entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 35.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 15.5. Digital Equity Bill of Rights [3120. - 3123.]

3120.

This title shall be known, and may be cited, as the Digital Equity Bill of Rights.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 436, Sec. 1.   (AB 414)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3121.

The Legislature finds and declares that digital equity, in which all individuals and communities have the information technology capacity needed for full participation in society, democracy, and the economy, is necessary for civic and cultural participation, employment, lifelong learning, and to access essential services. The Legislature further finds and declares that digital equity requires deployment and adoption of information technologies enabled by access to high-speed internet infrastructure, including wireline and wireless technologies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 436, Sec. 1.   (AB 414)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3122.

(a) It is the principle of the state, to ensure digital equity for all its residents, that residents shall have access to all of the following:

(1) Broadband that is sufficient and reliable, with internet speeds that are sufficient to meet the growing demand and reliance on access to education, government, public safety, economic
 prosperity, and health care through high-speed internet access. Determining minimum speeds for high-speed internet infrastructure should be performance based to support online educational opportunities, telehealth, and remote working by a majority of households online simultaneously with an increasing need for symmetrical network speeds.

(2) Broadband that is ubiquitous by ensuring that sufficient and reliable broadband access is available throughout the state, from the most rural areas, including tribal lands, to the most populated urban areas, including all low-income neighborhoods. Public broadband investments should be prioritized to connect entire communities and address digital redlining in historically unserved and underserved communities.

(3) Broadband
 that is affordable by ensuring that internet service plans are affordable for all residents of the state, regardless of their geographic location or household income.

(4) Broadband that provides educational opportunities and supports digital skills proficiency by providing residents of the state with access to opportunities to develop the skills needed to thrive in a digital world.

(5) Broadband that ensures public safety and maintains the peace of mind of the residents of the state that comes with knowing they have reliable access to emergency response services and emergency alert systems in the event of emergencies or catastrophic disasters.

(6) Broadband that improves quality of life by advancing economic status with
 access to educational opportunities, new job opportunities, and health care.

(7) Broadband that supports economic prosperity by ensuring that all workers, employers, businesses, entrepreneurs, startups, and enterprises, regardless of size, and including agriculture, have high-speed internet access that optimizes the value of their contributions to the economy to ensure global competitiveness.

(8) Broadband that attracts capital investment because ubiquitous high-speed internet infrastructure is essential to ensuring that the state continues to attract its fair share of global capital investment to support and enhance economic prosperity.

(9) Broadband that supports innovation and research by ensuring that high-speed
 internet infrastructure connects all research institutions to sustain world-class research and innovation that drives economic productivity.

(10) Broadband that empowers and enables participation in the democratic process so that all residents of the state are connected to the internet with sufficient speeds to participate in government, online educational opportunities, and telehealth for quality of life and public safety.

(b) It is the policy of the state that, to the extent technically feasible, broadband internet subscribers benefit from equal access to broadband internet service within the service area of a broadband provider.

(c) For purposes of this title, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Equal access” means the equal opportunity to subscribe to an offered service that provides comparable speeds, capacities, latency, and other quality-of-service metrics in a given geographical area, for comparable terms and conditions.

(2) “Broadband” means “Broadband Internet access service” as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 3100.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 436, Sec. 1.   (AB 414)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3123.

(a) This title does not create a private right of action against the state to enforce this title.

(b) This title does not create an obligation of the state to enforce the principle or policy established by this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 436, Sec. 1.   (AB 414)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 16. GENERAL PROVISIONS [3268. - 3268.]

3268.

Except where it is otherwise declared, the provisions of the foregoing titles of this part, in respect to the rights and obligations of parties to contracts, are subordinate to the intention of the parties, when ascertained in the manner prescribed by the chapter on the interpretation of contracts; and the benefit thereof may be waived by any party entitled thereto, unless such waiver would be against public policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 17. YEAR 2000 INFORMATION DISCLOSURES [3269. - 3271.]

3269.

For purposes of this title, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Year 2000 Problem” means any expected or actual computing, physical, enterprise, or distribution system complications that may occur in any computer system, computer program, software application, embedded systems, embedded chip calculations, or other computing application as a result of the year change from 1999 to 2000. These complications are often associated with the common programming practice of using a two-digit field to
 represent a year, resulting in erroneous date calculations, an ambiguous interpretation of the term “00,” the failure to recognize the year 2000 as a leap year, the use of algorithms that use the year “99” or “00” as a flag for another function, or the use of applications, software, or hardware that are date sensitive.

(b) “Information” means any assessment, projection, estimate, planning document, objective, timetable, test plan, test date, or test result related to the implementation or verification of Year 2000 Problem processing capabilities of a computer system, computer program, software application, embedded systems, embedded chip calculations, or other computing application and intended to solve a Year 2000 Problem.

(c) “Disclosure” and “discloses” mean any dissemination or provision of information without any expectation or right to remuneration or fee therefor.

(d) “Person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, business entity, joint venture, association, the State of California or any of its subdivisions, or any other organization, or any combination thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 83, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

3270.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, any person that discloses information regarding the Year 2000 Problem or any potential solutions to the problem, including, but not limited to, those persons described in subdivision (b), shall not be liable for damages in any tort action brought against that person regarding the Year 2000 Problem for any injury caused by, arising out of, or relating to, the use of the information disclosed, except as provided in Section 3271.

(b) This section
 shall apply to any person that, when making the disclosures described in subdivision (a), specifically disclaims the universal applicability of the potential solutions disclosed, and expresses a unique experience with any Year 2000 information.

(c) This section does not apply to prospective solutions sold or exchanged for profit or provided for profit by a person or entity holding itself out as a provider of Year 2000 solutions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 860, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

3271.

(a) Section 3270 shall not apply if the claimant in an action described in that section establishes that the Year 2000 Problem information disclosure was all of the following:

(1) Material.

(2) False, inaccurate, or misleading.

(3) Either (A) made with the knowledge that the statement was false, inaccurate, or misleading, (B) if the information
 disclosed was a republication of or otherwise a repetition of information from another person, made without a disclosure that the information was based on information supplied by another person or made with the knowledge that the statement was false, inaccurate, or misleading, or (C) made with gross negligence in the determination of the truth or accuracy of the disclosure or in the determination of whether the disclosure was misleading.

(b) Nothing in this title shall be deemed to affect any other remedy available at law, including, but not limited to, temporary or permanent injunctive relief, against a public or private entity or individual with respect to Year 2000 Problem information disclosures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 860, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 18. PROVIDERS OF HEALTH AND SAFETY LABOR OR SERVICES [3273. - 3273.]

3273.

(a) It is unlawful for a person, firm, corporation, or association that is a nongovernmental entity and contracts to perform public health and safety labor or services for a public agency to display on a vehicle a logo of the public agency that reasonably could be interpreted or construed as implying that the labor or services are being provided by employees of the public agency, unless the vehicle
 conspicuously displays a statement indicating that the contractor is the service provider, contractor, or other appropriate descriptor, such as “SERVICE PROVIDED BY:” or “CONTRACTED BY:”, immediately followed by all of the following:

(1) The logo and the name of the person, firm, corporation, or association that is the nongovernmental entity providing the public health and safety labor or services for the public agency.

(2) The state, or if outside of the United States, the country where the nongovernmental entity’s controlling person, firm, corporation, or association is legally incorporated, organized, or formed.

(b) It is unlawful for a person or an employee of a person, firm, corporation, or association that is a nongovernmental entity and contracts to perform public health and safety labor or services for a
 public agency to wear a uniform bearing a logo of the public agency that reasonably could be interpreted or construed as implying that the labor or services are being provided by employees of the public agency, unless the uniform conspicuously displays the logo and the name of the person, firm, corporation, or association that is the nongovernmental entity providing the labor or services for the public agency.

(c) The disclosures required pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) shall apply to all labor or services provided pursuant to a contract entered into on or after January 1, 2015.

(d) (1) It is unlawful for a public agency to require, through a contract with a person, firm, corporation, or association that is a nongovernmental entity providing public health and safety labor or services, a person or employee of the nongovernmental entity to wear a badge
 containing the logo of the public agency.

(2) It is unlawful for a person, firm, corporation, or association that is a nongovernmental entity contracting to perform public health and safety labor or services for a public agency to require a person or its employee to wear a badge containing the logo of the public agency.

(e) For the purposes of subdivision (b), an identifying mark affixed to a uniform as required by state or federal law, and a local agency regulating the activity of the person, firm, corporation, or association shall not be construed as implying that the labor or services are being provided by employees of the public agency.

(f) If a vehicle or uniform displays more than one logo referring to the public agency, then the required disclosure shall be placed near the largest logo referring to the public
 agency.

(g) The disclosure requirements in subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section shall not apply to uniforms or vehicles if the person, firm, corporation, or association that is the nongovernmental entity is providing the labor or services for a public agency under Article 3.3 (commencing with Section 2430) of Chapter 2 of Division 2 of the Vehicle Code.

(h) The disclosure requirements in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall not apply to a public agency vehicle utilized by the nongovernmental entity during a declared state or federal disaster, mass-casualty incident, or other incident that requires the use of state or federal resources when the public agency requires the use of the public agency vehicle.

(i) (1) Violations of this section shall be subject to the remedies provided in the Consumers
 Legal Remedies Act (Title 1.5 (commencing with Section 1750)).

(2) The duties, rights, and remedies provided in this section are in addition to any other duties, rights, and remedies provided by state law.

(j) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Conspicuously displays” means to display a disclosure on the exterior of a vehicle or uniform in the same location as the logo of the public agency, placed prominently as compared with other words, statements, or designs displayed in connection with the logo of the public agency. With respect to a uniform, “in the same location” includes, but is not limited to, a location on the opposing shoulder, pocket, or similar opposing location relative to the location of the logo of the public agency.

(2) “Logo” means a symbol, graphic, seal, emblem, insignia, trade name, brand name, or picture identifying a person, firm, corporation, association, or public agency. “Logo” shall not mean the name of a public agency used alone.

(3) “Public agency” means a state entity, a city, county, city and county, special district, or other political subdivision of the state.

(4) “Public health and safety labor or services” means fire protection services, rescue services, prehospital emergency medical services, hazardous material emergency response services, and ambulance services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 25, Sec. 1.   (SB 84)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 19. COVID-19 Small Landlord and Homeowner Relief Act [3273.01. - 3273.16.]



  CHAPTER 1. Title and Definitions [3273.01. - 3273.2.]

3273.01.

This title is known, and may be cited, as the “COVID-19 Small Landlord and Homeowner Relief Act of 2020.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 37, Sec. 13.   (AB 3088)   Effective August 31, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.1.

For purposes of this title:

(a) (1) “Borrower” means any of the following:

(A) A natural person who is a mortgagor or trustor or a confirmed successor in interest, as defined in Section 1024.31 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(B) An entity other than a natural person only if the secured property contains no more than four dwelling units and is currently occupied by one or more residential tenants.

(2) “Borrower” shall not include an individual who has surrendered the secured property as evidenced by either a letter confirming the surrender or delivery of
 the keys to the property to the mortgagee, trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent.

(3) Unless the property securing the mortgage contains one or more deed-restricted affordable housing units or one or more affordable housing units subject to a regulatory restriction limiting rental rates that is contained in an agreement with a government agency, the following mortgagors shall not be considered a “borrower”:

(A) A real estate investment trust, as defined in Section 856 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(B) A corporation.

(C) A limited liability company in which at least one member is a corporation.

(4) “Borrower” shall also mean a person who holds a power of attorney for a borrower
 described in paragraph (1).

(b) “Effective time period” means the time period between the operational date of this title and December 1, 2021.

(c) (1) “Mortgage servicer” or “lienholder” means a person or entity who directly services a loan or who is responsible for interacting with the borrower, managing the loan account on a daily basis, including collecting and crediting periodic loan payments, managing any escrow account, or enforcing the note and security instrument, either as the current owner of the promissory note or as the current owner’s authorized agent.

(2) “Mortgage servicer” or
 “lienholder” also means a subservicing agent to a master servicer by contract.

(3) “Mortgage servicer” shall not include a trustee, or a trustee’s authorized agent, acting under a power of sale pursuant to a deed of trust.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 27, Sec. 6.   (AB 832)   Effective June 28, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.2.

(a) The provisions of this title apply to a mortgage or deed of trust that is secured by residential property containing no more than four dwelling units, including individual units of condominiums or cooperatives, and that was outstanding as of the enactment date of this title.

(b) The provisions of this title shall apply to a depository institution chartered under federal or state law, a person covered by the licensing requirements of Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000) or Division 20 (commencing with Section 50000) of the Financial Code, or a person licensed pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 37, Sec. 13.   (AB 3088)   Effective August 31, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Mortgages [3273.10. - 3273.16.]

3273.10.

(a) If a mortgage servicer denies a forbearance request made during the effective time period, the mortgage servicer shall provide written notice to the borrower that sets forth the specific reason or reasons that forbearance was not provided, if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The borrower was current on payment as of February 1, 2020.

(2) The borrower is experiencing a financial hardship that prevents the borrower from making timely payments on the mortgage obligation due, directly or indirectly, to the COVID-19 emergency.

(b) If the written notice in subdivision (a) cites any defect in the borrower’s request, including
 an incomplete application or missing information, that is curable, the mortgage servicer shall do all of the following:

(1) Specifically identify any curable defect in the written notice.

(2) Provide 21 days from the mailing date of the written notice for the borrower to cure any identified defect.

(3) Accept receipt of the borrower’s revised request for forbearance before the aforementioned 21-day period lapses.

(4) Respond to the borrower’s revised request within five business days of receipt of the revised request.

(c) If a mortgage servicer denies a forbearance request made during the effective time period, the declaration required by subdivision (b) of Section 2923.5 shall include the
 written notice together with a statement as to whether forbearance was or was not subsequently provided.

(d) A mortgage servicer, mortgagee, or beneficiary of the deed of trust, or an authorized agent thereof, who, with respect to a borrower of a federally backed mortgage, complies with the relevant provisions regarding forbearance in Section 4022 of the federal Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (the CARES Act) (Public Law 116-136), including any amendments or revisions to those provisions, shall be deemed to be in compliance with this section. A mortgage servicer of a nonfederally backed mortgage that provides forbearance that is consistent with the requirements of the CARES Act for federally backed mortgages shall be deemed to be in compliance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 142, Sec. 6.   (AB 295)   Effective July 18, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.11.

(a) A mortgage servicer shall comply with applicable federal guidance regarding borrower options following a COVID-19 related forbearance.

(b) Any mortgage servicer, mortgagee, or beneficiary of the deed of trust, or authorized agent thereof, who, with respect to a borrower of a federally backed loan, complies with the guidance to mortgagees regarding borrower options following a COVID-19-related forbearance provided by the Federal National Mortgage Association (Fannie Mae), the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation (Freddie Mac), the Federal Housing Administration of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, or the Rural Development division of the United States
 Department of Agriculture, including any amendments, updates, or revisions to that guidance, shall be deemed to be in compliance with this section.

(c) With respect to a nonfederally backed loan, any mortgage servicer, mortgagee, or beneficiary of the deed of trust, or authorized agent thereof, who, regarding borrower options following a COVID-19 related forbearance, reviews a customer for a solution that is consistent with the guidance to servicers, mortgagees, or beneficiaries provided by Fannie Mae, Freddie Mac, the Federal Housing Administration of the Department of Housing and Urban Development, the Department of Veterans Affairs, or the Rural Development division of the Department of Agriculture, including any amendments, updates or revisions to such guidance, shall be deemed to be in compliance with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 37, Sec. 13.   (AB 3088)   Effective August 31, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.12.

It is the intent of the Legislature that a mortgage servicer offer a borrower a postforbearance loss mitigation option that is consistent with the mortgage servicer’s contractual or other authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 37, Sec. 13.   (AB 3088)   Effective August 31, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.14.

A mortgage servicer shall communicate about forbearance and postforbearance options described in this article in the borrower’s preferred language when the mortgage servicer regularly communicates with any borrower in that language.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 37, Sec. 13.   (AB 3088)   Effective August 31, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.15.

(a) A borrower who is harmed by a material violation of this title may bring an action to obtain injunctive relief, damages, restitution, and any other remedy to redress the violation.

(b) A court may award a prevailing borrower reasonable attorney’s fees and costs in any action based on any violation of this title in which injunctive relief against a sale, including a temporary restraining order, is granted. A court may award a prevailing borrower reasonable attorney’s fees and costs in an action for a violation of this article in which relief is granted but injunctive relief against a sale is not granted.

(c) The rights, remedies, and procedures provided to borrowers by
 this section are in addition to and independent of any other rights, remedies, or procedures under any other law. This section shall not be construed to alter, limit, or negate any other rights, remedies, or procedures provided to borrowers by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 37, Sec. 13.   (AB 3088)   Effective August 31, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.16.

Any waiver by a borrower of the provisions of this article is contrary to public policy and shall be void.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 37, Sec. 13.   (AB 3088)   Effective August 31, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 19.1. Mortgage Forbearance Act [3273.20. - 3273.30.]

3273.20.

This title is known, and may be cited, as the “Mortgage Forbearance Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   (AB 238)   Effective September 22, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.21.

For purposes of this title, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) (1) “Borrower” means a natural person who is a mortgagor or trustor, or a person who holds a power of attorney for a mortgagor or trustor.

(2) “Borrower” does not include an individual who has surrendered the secured property as evidenced by either a letter confirming the surrender or delivery of the keys to the property to the mortgagee, trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent.

(3) “Borrower” does not include an individual who has a recorded notice of default
 recorded against the real property that is secured by the residential mortgage loan before the beginning of the wildfire disaster unless the notice of default was rescinded.

(b) “Federally backed loan” means a residential mortgage loan that is insured, guaranteed, purchased, or secured by a federal agency or government-sponsored entity.

(c) “Disaster-related forbearance relief” means the relief described in servicing guidelines for federally backed loans.

(d) (1) “Mortgage servicer” means a person or entity who directly services a loan or who is responsible for interacting with the borrower, managing the loan account on a daily basis, including collecting and
 crediting periodic loan payments, managing any escrow account, or enforcing the note and security instrument, either as the current owner of the promissory note or as the current owner’s authorized agent.

(2) “Mortgage servicer” also means a subservicing agent to a master servicer by contract.

(3) “Mortgage servicer” does not include a trustee, or a trustee’s authorized agent, acting under a power of sale pursuant to a deed of trust. 

(e) “Residential mortgage loan” means a loan that is secured by residential real property improved by four or fewer residential units.

(f) “Wildfire disaster” means the conditions described in the proclamation of a state of
 emergency issued by Governor Gavin Newsom on January 7, 2025, or the federally declared disaster, declared on January 8, 2025, related to the Eaton Wildfire, the Palisades Fire, and the Straight-line Winds (DR-4856-CA).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   (AB 238)   Effective September 22, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.22.

This title applies to a depository institution chartered under federal or state law, a person covered by the licensing requirements of Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000) or Division 20 (commencing with Section 50000) of the Financial Code, or a person licensed pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   (AB 238)   Effective September 22, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.23.

(a) A borrower who is experiencing financial hardship that prevents the borrower from making timely payments on a residential mortgage loan due directly to the wildfire disaster may request forbearance on the residential mortgage loan by doing both of the following:

(1) Submitting a request to the borrower’s mortgage loan servicer before the earlier of either of the following:

(A) Six months after the date upon which the state of emergency issued by Governor Gavin Newsom on January 7, 2025, is terminated.

(B) January 7, 2027.

(2) Affirming that the borrower is experiencing a financial hardship due to the wildfire disaster.

(b) Upon a request by a borrower for forbearance under subdivision (a), a mortgage servicer shall offer mortgage payment forbearance for a period of up to an initial 90 days, which shall be extended at the request of the borrower in 90-day increments, up to a maximum forbearance period of 12 months.

(c) The borrower shall be notified within 10 business days by the mortgage servicer whether their request for forbearance has been approved.

(d) If the mortgage servicer, acting under delegated authority to make forbearance determinations on behalf of the investor,
 denies a forbearance request within the maximum allowable forbearance period of 12 months pursuant to subdivision (b), the mortgage servicer shall not be in violation of this section if the mortgage servicer provides written notice to the borrower stating the specific reason for denial. The notice shall include both of the following:

(1) A clear and concise explanation of the specific investor provision that is the basis for the denial.

(2) The text of the specific investor guideline or contractual provision that is the basis for the denial of the borrower’s forbearance request.

(e) If the written notice in subdivision (c) cites any defect in the borrower’s request, including an incomplete application or
 missing information, that is curable, the mortgage servicer shall do all of the following:

(1) Specifically identify any curable defect in the written notice.

(2) Provide 21 calendar days from the mailing date of the written notice for the borrower to cure any identified defect.
